Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2932
No liability as member for limited cooperative association obligations.

Unless otherwise provided by the articles of organization, an obligation of a limited cooperative association, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise, is not the obligation of a member. A member is not personally liable, by way of contribution or otherwise, for an obligation of the limited cooperative association solely by reason of being a member.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 32.